Illinois, session 104th, HB4420.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The College Campus Press Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5, 10, 20, 25, and 35 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 13/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. For purposes of this Act:8    "Campus media" means any matter that is prepared, 9substantially written, published, or broadcast by students at 10State-sponsored institutions of higher learning, that is 11distributed or generally made available, either free of charge 12or for a fee, to members of the student body, and that is 13prepared under the direction of a student media adviser. 14"Campus media" does not include media that is intended for 15distribution or transmission solely in the classrooms in which 16it is produced.17    "Campus policy" means the views and positions of 18State-sponsored institutions of higher learning promulgated by 19administrators, officials, or other agents of these 20institutions.21    "Collegiate media adviser" means a person who is employed, 22appointed, or designated by the State-sponsored institution of 23higher learning to supervise or provide instruction relating   HB4420 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17839 LNS 31273 b1to campus media.2    "Collegiate student editor" means a student at a 3State-sponsored institution of higher learning who edits 4information prepared by collegiate student journalists for 5dissemination in campus media.6    "Collegiate student journalist" means a student at a 7State-sponsored institution of higher learning who gathers, 8compiles, writes, photographs, records, or prepares 9information for dissemination in campus media.10    "Prevailing party" includes any party who obtains some of 11his or her requested relief through judicial judgment in his 12or her favor, who obtains some of his or her requested relief 13through a settlement agreement approved by the court, or whose 14pursuit of a non-frivolous claim was a catalyst for a 15unilateral change in position by the opposing party relative 16to the relief sought.17    "Public media produced at a State-sponsored institution of 18higher learning" means media created and distributed in print 19or audiovisual format that has been produced by an entity 20receiving public funding and that has a license or other 21agreement with a State-sponsored institution of higher 22learning to use that institution's resources for the purposes 23of creating or distributing the media for which the entity 24receives public funding. 25    "State-sponsored institution of higher learning" means the 26University of Illinois, Southern Illinois University, Chicago   HB4420 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17839 LNS 31273 b1State University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 2University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 3University, Northern Illinois University, Western Illinois 4University, and public community colleges subject to the 5Public Community College Act.6(Source: P.A. 95-580, eff. 6-1-08.) 7    (110 ILCS 13/10)8    Sec. 10. Public forum. 9    (a) All campus media produced primarily by students at a 10State-sponsored institution of higher learning is a public 11forum for expression by the student journalists and editors at 12the particular institution. Campus media, whether 13campus-sponsored or noncampus-sponsored, is not subject to 14prior review by public officials of a State-sponsored 15institution of higher learning.16    (b) All public media produced at a State-sponsored 17institution of higher learning is a public forum for 18expression by the employees producing the media, including 19journalists and editors, at the institution of higher 20learning. Public media produced at a State-sponsored 21institution of higher learning is not subject to prior review 22by public officials of the State-sponsored institution of 23higher learning. 24(Source: P.A. 95-580, eff. 6-1-08.)   HB4420 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17839 LNS 31273 b1    (110 ILCS 13/20)2    Sec. 20. Injunction and declaratory relief. A collegiate 3student enrolled in a State-sponsored institution of higher 4learning, or a collegiate media advisor of a State-sponsored 5institution of higher learning, or an employee or agent of an 6entity creating or distributing public media produced at a 7State-sponsored institution of higher learning may commence a 8civil action to obtain appropriate injunctive and declaratory 9relief as determined by a court for violation of Section 10 of 10this Act by such State-sponsored institution of higher 11learning. Upon motion, a court may award attorney's fees to a 12prevailing party in a civil action brought under this Section.13(Source: P.A. 95-580, eff. 6-1-08.) 14    (110 ILCS 13/25)15    Sec. 25. Campus policy and speech distinguished. 16Expression made by a collegiate student journalist, collegiate 17student editor, employee or agent of an entity creating or 18distributing public media produced at a State-sponsored 19institution of higher learning, or other contributor in campus 20media or public media produced at a State-sponsored 21institution of higher learning is neither an expression of 22campus policy nor speech attributable to a State-sponsored 23institution of higher learning.24(Source: P.A. 95-580, eff. 6-1-08.)   HB4420 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17839 LNS 31273 b1    (110 ILCS 13/35)2    Sec. 35. Immunity. A State-sponsored institution of higher 3learning shall be immune from any lawsuit arising from 4expression actually made in campus media or public media 5produced at a State-sponsored institution of higher learning, 6with the exception of the institution's own expression.7(Source: P.A. 95-580, eff. 6-1-08.)